Montana, session 2025, SB466.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Best interests of child -- factors to consider. (1) In any circumstance in which the best
interests of a child must be determined, the following factors, to the extent they are present, must be
considered but are not exhaustive:
(a) the physical and emotional safety of the child;
(b) the temperament and developmental needs of the child;
(c) the capacity and the disposition of the parents to understand and meet the needs of the child;
(d) any relevant and material information obtained from the child, including the informed
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 466
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 466
preferences of the child;
(e) the wishes of the child's parents as to custody;
(f) the past and current interaction and relationship of the child with each parent, the child's
siblings, and any other person who may significantly affect the best interests of the child;
(g) the importance of family integrity, the emotional ties, and relationships between the child and
the child's parents, siblings, family, household members, or other caregivers;
(h) the willingness and ability of each parent to facilitate and encourage continuing parent-child
relationship between the child and the other parent as is appropriate, including compliance with any court
orders;
(i) any manipulation by or coercive behavior of the parents in an effort to involve the child in the
parents' dispute;
(j) the ability of each parent to be actively involved in the life of the child;
(k) the child's adjustment to the child's home, school, and community environments;
(l) the capacity of the parents to provide a stable home and adequate food, clothing, and medical
care may not be based solely on the socioeconomic status of a parent;
(m) the mental and physical health of all individuals involved, except that a disability of a proposed
custodial parent or other party, in and of itself, may not be determinative of custody unless the proposed
custodial arrangement is not in the best interests of the child;
(n) the child's cultural background;
(o) the effect on the child exposed to an offense identified in 45-5-202, 45-5-206, 45-5-213, or 45-
5-215 against a partner or family member in the presence of the child by a predominant aggressor;
(p) whether the child or a sibling of the child has been abused or neglected, as defined in 41-3-
102; and
(q) whether the party satisfactorily completes participation in a parenting education program
established pursuant to a court directive.
(2) A court is not required to assign any weight to any of the factors that it considers but shall
articulate the basis for its decision.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 466
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 466
Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as a new part in Title 41,
chapter 1, and the provisions of Title 41, chapter 1, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 466
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 466, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 466
INTRODUCED BY D. LENZ
AN ACT ESTABLISHING FACTORS THAT MUST BE CONSIDERED WHEN DETERMINING THE BEST
INTERESTS OF A CHILD.”